Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters.
Chapter 10.
Compacts and Joint Laws with Other States.

Article 1.

Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact.

28.2-1000.Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact.

28.2-1000.1.Authority of Governor to implement menhaden management measures.

28.2-1000.2.(Expires December 31, 2010) Annual closure of the Chesapeake Bay purse seine fishery for Atlantic menhaden.

Article 2.

Potomac River Compact; Related Laws.

28.2-1001.Potomac River Compact.

28.2-1002.Cooperation of agencies of Commonwealth.

28.2-1003.Authority to regulate dredging of soft shell clams.

28.2-1004.Authority to authorize and regulate experimental oyster hatchery program.

28.2-1005.Authority to regulate dredging of oysters.

28.2-1006.Lawfully harvested finfish and shellfish; possession, storage, marketing and disposal.

28.2-1007.(Contingent effective date - see Editor's note) Authority to regulate leasing.